Utah statutes.
35A-8-427.   Public body may provide financial aid.

In addition to other aids provided, a public body may provide financial aid to a housing authority by:

(1)  loan, donation, grant, contribution, and appropriation of money;

(2)  abatement or remission of taxes;

(3)  payments in lieu of taxes;

(4)  other charges; or

(5)  other means.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 212, 2012 General Session

